fr: Matériau de la tête de goudron: Peau de buffle; Peau de veau; Peau de chameau; Peau de chèvre; Hybride (peau + synthétique); Peau naturelle (non spécifié); Peau de mouton; Synthétique (Mylar); Synthétique (PU); Synthétique (fibre); Autre
bg-BG: Материал на мембраната на тара: Биволска кожа; Телешка кожа; Камилска кожа; Козя кожа; Хибридна (кожа + синтетика); Естествена кожа (неуточнена); Овча кожа; Синтетика (Mylar); Синтетика (PU); Синтетика (влакно); Друго
el: Υλικό μεμβράνης από δέρμα: Δέρμα βουβαλιού; Δέρμα μοσχαριού; Δέρμα καμήλας; Δέρμα κατσίκας; Υβριδικό (δέρμα + συνθετικό); Φυσικό δέρμα (μη καθορισμένο); Δέρμα προβάτου; Συνθετικό (Mylar); Συνθετικό (PU); Συνθετικό (ίνα); Άλλο
es: Material del cabezal del tar: Piel de búfalo; Piel de becerro; Piel de camello; Piel de cabra; Híbrido (piel y sintético); Piel natural (no especificada); Piel de oveja; Sintético (Mylar); Sintético (PU); Sintético (fibra); Otro
ko: 타르 헤드 소재: 물소 가죽; 송아지 가죽; 낙타 가죽; 염소 가죽; 하이브리드(가죽 + 합성 소재); 천연 가죽(미지정); 양 가죽; 합성 소재(마일라); 합성 소재(PU); 합성 소재(파이버); 기타
zh-TW: 土耳其框鼓鼓皮材質: 水牛皮; 小牛皮; 駱駝皮; 山羊皮; 混合 (獸皮 + 合成材質); 天然獸皮 (未指定); 綿羊皮; 合成材質 (聚酯薄膜); 合成材質 (PU); 合成材質 (纖維); 其他
pl: Materiał membrany taru: Skóra bawola; Skóra cielęca; Skóra wielbłądzia; Skóra kozia; Hybrydowa (skóra i materiał syntetyczny); Skóra naturalna (nieokreślona); Skóra owcza; Syntetyczna (Mylar); Syntetyczna (PU); Syntetyczna (włókno); Inny
sl-SI: Material opne bobna tar: Bivolja koža; Telečja koža; Kamelja koža; Kozja koža; Hibrid (koža + sintetika); Naravna koža (ni določeno); Ovčja koža; Sintetika (Mylar); Sintetika (PU); Sintetika (vlakna); Drugo
en: Tar head material: Buffalo skin; Calf skin; Camel skin; Goat skin; Hybrid (skin + synthetic); Natural skin (unspecified); Sheep skin; Synthetic (Mylar); Synthetic (PU); Synthetic (fiber); Other
it: Materiale della testa del tamburo: Pelle di bufalo; Pelle di vitello; Pelle di cammello; Pelle di capra; Ibrido (pelle e sintetico); Pelle naturale (non specificata); Pelle di pecora; Sintetico (Mylar); Sintetico (PU); Sintetico (fibra); Altro
hu: Tar dob fejrész anyaga: Bivalybőr; Borjúbőr; Tevebőr; Kecskebőr; Hibrid (bőr és szintetikus); Természetes bőr (nem specifikált); Juhbőr; Szintetikus (Mylar); Szintetikus (PU); Szintetikus (szál); Egyéb
de: Material des Tarfells: Büffelfell; Kalbsfell; Kamelfell; Ziegenfell; Hybrid (Fell + Synthetik); Naturfell (unspezifiziert); Schaffell; Synthetik (Mylar); Synthetik (PU); Synthetik (Faser); Sonstige
ru: Материал мембраны тара: Кожа буйвола; Телячья кожа; Верблюжья кожа; Козья кожа; Гибридная (кожа + синтетика); Натуральная кожа (без уточнения); Овечья кожа; Синтетика (майлар); Синтетика (ПУ); Синтетика (волокно); Другое
cs: Materiál blány bubnu tar: Buvolí kůže; Telecí kůže; Velbloudí kůže; Kozí kůže; Hybridní (kůže a syntetika); Přírodní kůže (nespecifikováno); Ovčí kůže; Syntetika (Mylar); Syntetika (PU); Syntetika (vlákno); Jiné
nb: Målkomponenter: Bøffelskinn; Kalveskinn; Kamelskinn; Geiteskinn; Hybrid (skinn + syntetisk); Naturskinn (uspesifisert); Saueskinn; Syntetisk (Mylar); Syntetisk (PU); Syntetisk (fiber); Annet
da: Materiale i tar-skind: Bøffelskind; Kalveskind; Kamelskind; Gedeskind; Hybrid (skind + syntetisk); Naturskind (uspecificeret); Fåreskind; Syntetisk (Mylar); Syntetisk (PU); Syntetisk (fiber); Andet
nl: Materiaal trommelvel: Buffelvel; Kalfsvel; Kameelvel; Geitenvel; Hybride (vel + synthetisch); Natuurlijk vel (ongespecificeerd); Schapenvel; Synthetisch (Mylar); Synthetisch (PU); Synthetisch (vezel); Overig
sk-SK: Materiál dechtovej hlavy: Byvolia koža; Teľacia koža; Ťavia koža; Kozia koža; Hybridná (koža + syntetika); Prírodná koža (nešpecifikovaná); Ovčia koža; Syntetická (mylar); Syntetická (PU); Syntetická (vlákno); Iné
zh-CN: 塔尔鼓鼓面材质: 水牛皮; 小牛皮; 骆驼皮; 山羊皮; 混合（真皮 + 合成材料）; 天然真皮（未指定）; 绵羊皮; 合成材料 (Mylar); 合成材料 (PU); 合成（纤维）; 其他
pt-PT: Material da pele do tar: Pele de búfalo; Pele de bezerro; Pele de camelo; Pele de cabra; Híbrido (pele + sintético); Pele natural (não especificado); Pele de ovelha; Sintético (Mylar); Sintético (PU); Sintético (fibra); Outro
ja: タールヘッド素材: バッファロースキン; カーフスキン; キャメルスキン; ゴートスキン; ハイブリッド (皮革+合成素材); 天然皮革 (指定なし); シープスキン; 合成素材 (マイラー); 合成素材 (PU); 合成素材 (繊維); その他
hr-HR: Materijal glave strijele: Bivolja koža; Teleća koža; Devina koža; Kozja koža; Hibrid (koža i sintetika); Prirodna koža (nespecificirano); Ovčja koža; Sintetika (Mylar); Sintetika (PU); Sintetika (vlakno); Ostalo
th: วัสดุของหนังกลอง: หนังควาย; หนังลูกวัว; หนังอูฐ; หนังแพะ; ไฮบริด (หนังแท้และหนังสังเคราะห์); หนังแท้ (ไม่ระบุ); หนังแกะ; หนังสังเคราะห์ (Mylar); หนังสังเคราะห์ (PU); หนังสังเคราะห์ (ไฟเบอร์); อื่นๆ
sv: Material för tjärhuvud: Buffelskinn; Kalvskinn; Kamelskinn; Getskinn; Hybrid (skinn och syntet); Naturskinn (ospecificerat); Fårskinn; Syntetiskt (Mylar); Syntetiskt (PU); Syntetiskt (fiber); Annat
ro-RO: Material al membranei tarului: Piele de bivol; Piele de vițel; Piele de cămilă; Piele de capră; Hibrid (piele + sintetic); Piele naturală (nespecificat); Piele de oaie; Sintetic (Mylar); Sintetic (PU); Sintetic (fibră); Altele
lt-LT: Taro galvutės medžiaga: Buivolo oda; Veršiuko oda; Kupranugario oda; Ožkos oda; Hibridinė (oda + sintetika); Natūrali oda (nenurodyta); Avies oda; Sintetinė (Mylar); Sintetinė (PU); Sintetinė (pluoštas); Kita
tr: Tar başlık malzemesi: Manda derisi; Dana derisi; Deve derisi; Keçi derisi; Hibrit (deri + sentetik); Doğal deri (belirtilmemiş); Koyun derisi; Sentetik (Mylar); Sentetik (PU); Sentetik (fiber); Diğer
pt-BR: Material do cabeçote em piche: Pele de búfalo; Pele de bezerro; Pele de camelo; Pele de cabra; Híbrida (pele + sintética); Pele natural (não especificada); Pele de ovelha; Sintética (Mylar); Sintética (PU); Sintética (fibra); Outra
vi: Chất liệu mặt trống Tar: Da trâu; Da bê; Da lạc đà; Da dê; Lai (da + tổng hợp); Da tự nhiên (không xác định); Da cừu; Tổng hợp (Mylar); Tổng hợp (PU); Tổng hợp (sợi); Khác
fi: Tar-rummun kalvon materiaali: Puhvelinnahka; Vasikannahka; Kamelinnahka; Vuohennahka; Hybridi (nahka ja synteettinen); Luonnonnahka (määrittelemätön); Lampaannahka; Synteettinen (Mylar); Synteettinen (PU); Synteettinen (kuitu); Muu